Tennessee, session 114, SB0824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1352(a)(6), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1360" and substituting "§ 39-17-1353".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1358(b), is amended by
deleting "§ 39-17-1360" and substituting "§ 39-17-1353".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) Except as provided in § 39-17-1313, this section does not preclude an
individual, corporation, business entity, or local, state, or federal government entity or
agent thereof from posting signage in prominent locations advising patrons that anyone
possessing a firearm on the premises may be denied admission onto the premises or
required to leave the premises by the owner or manager.
(b)
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), this section does not
authorize an entity of local government or a permittee thereof to enact or enforce
a prohibition or restriction on the possession of a handgun by an enhanced
handgun carry permit holder or concealed handgun carry permit holder on
property owned or administered by the entity unless:
(A) The following are provided at each public entrance to the
property:
(i) Metal detection devices; and
SB0824
002178
- 1 -

(ii) At least one (1) law enforcement or private security
officer who has been adequately trained to conduct inspections of
persons entering the property by use of metal detection devices;
and
(B) Each person who enters the property through the public
entrance when the property is open to the public and any bag, package,
and other container carried by the person is inspected by a law
enforcement or private security officer described in subdivision
(b)(1)(A)(ii) or an authorized representative with the authority to deny
entry to the property.
(2) The restrictions in subdivision (b)(1) do not apply to:
(A) Facilities that are licensed under title 33, title 37, or title 68;
(B) Property on which firearms are prohibited by § 39-17-1309 or
§ 39-17-1311(b)(1)(H)(ii);
(C) Property on which firearms are prohibited by § 39-17-1306 at
all times regardless of whether judicial proceedings are in progress;
(D) Buildings that contain a law enforcement agency, as defined
in § 39-13-519;
(E) Libraries; or
(F) Facilities that are licensed by the department of human
services under title 71, chapter 3, part 5, and administer a Head Start
program.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002178